Ohio, session 136, HB989.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 4506.26 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 4506.26. (A)(1) The township commercial driver's license training reimbursement program is created in the department of public safety. Under the program, the director of public safety shall reimburse a board of county commissioners, a board of township trustees, or an individual township trustee, as applicable, the costs associated with a township trustee completing the training required to obtain a commercial driver's license. (2) The director shall provide reimbursement for training costs under the program if all of the following apply: (a) The township trustee successfully completes commercial driver's license training and obtains an Ohio commercial driver's license. (b) The township trustee either holds a township office or is elected to hold a township office commencing on the first day of January next after the trustee's election at the time that the commercial driver's license training is completed. (c) The costs of the commercial driver's license training were paid by the township trustee or by the board of township trustees or the board of county commissioners on behalf of the township trustee. (B)(1) The director shall establish an application form for reimbursement under the program and make it available on the department's web site. (2) To apply for reimbursement, the board of county commissioners, board of township trustees, or individual township trustee, as applicable, shall submit a completed application to the department. The application shall include all of the following: (a) Proof that the township trustee enrolled in and successfully completed the commercial driver's license training from an authorized driver training school pursuant to section 4508.031 of the Revised Code or an authorized driver training provider listed on the federal motor carrier safety administration's training provider registry; (b) Proof that the tuition costs of the commercial driver's license training were paid by the township trustee or by the board of township trustees or the board of county commissioners on behalf of the township trustee and documentation of the amount of those tuition costs; (c) Proof that the township trustee obtained an Ohio commercial driver's license; (d) The signature of the township trustee or representative from the board of county commissioners or board of township trustees making the application; (e) Any other documentation the director requires. (C) The director shall approve any application that meets the requirements of this section. If approved, the director shall reimburse the full amount of the tuition costs of the commercial driver's license training to the board of county commissioners, the board of township trustees, or the individual township trustee, as applicable. (D) The director shall establish any procedures and requirements necessary to administer this section. Section 2. The reimbursement authorized under section 4506.26 of the Revised Code applies only to township trustees who are elected after the effective date of this section.